Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. Merger and Consolidation.

Sec. 29.06.090.
Merger and consolidation.

Two or more municipalities may merge or consolidate to form a single general law or home rule municipality, except a third class borough may not be formed through merger or consolidation.

Two methods may be used to initiate merger or consolidation of municipalities:

petition to the Local Boundary Commission under regulations adopted by the commission; or

the local option method specified in AS

29.06.100

—

29.06.160

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for merger of municipalities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 5.

For standards for consolidation of municipalities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 6.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.100.
Petition.

Residents of two or more municipalities may file a merger or consolidation petition with the department. The petition must be signed by a number of voters of each existing municipality equal to at least 25 percent of the number of votes cast in each municipality’s last regular election.

The petition includes

the name and class of each existing municipality;

the name and class of the proposed municipality;

the proposed composition and apportionment of the governing body;

maps, documents, and other information that shows that the proposed municipality meets the standards for municipal incorporation;

for a home rule municipality, a proposed home rule charter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 16 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.110.
Review.

The department shall review a merger or consolidation petition for content and signatures and shall return a deficient petition for correction or completion.

If the petition contains the required information and signatures, the department shall investigate the proposal.

The department shall report its findings to the Local Boundary Commission with its recommendations regarding the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.120.
Hearing.

After receipt of the report by the department on a merger or consolidation petition, the Local Boundary Commission shall hold at least one public hearing in each of the existing municipalities included in the petition, unless officials of the municipalities agree to a single hearing.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.130.
Decision.

The Local Boundary Commission may amend the petition and may impose conditions for the merger or consolidation. If the commission determines that the merger or consolidation, as amended or conditioned if appropriate, meets applicable standards under the state constitution and commission regulations, the municipality after the merger or consolidation would meet the standards for incorporation under AS

29.05.011

or

29.05.031

, and the merger or consolidation is in the best interests of the state, it may accept the petition. Otherwise, it shall reject the petition.

A Local Boundary Commission decision under this section may be appealed under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 17 ch 58 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.140.
Election.

The Local Boundary Commission shall immediately notify the director of elections of its acceptance of a merger or consolidation petition. Within 30 days after notification, the director of elections shall order an election in the area to be included in the new municipality to determine whether the voters desire merger or consolidation. The election shall be held not less than 30 or more than 90 days after the election order. A voter who is a resident of the area to be included in the proposed municipality may vote.

A home rule charter in a merger or consolidation petition submitted under AS

29.06.100(b)(5)

is part of the merger or consolidation question. The charter is adopted if the voters approve the merger or consolidation. The director of elections shall supervise the election in the general manner prescribed by AS 15 (Election Code). The state shall pay all election costs.

The director of elections shall certify the election results. If merger or consolidation is approved, the director of elections shall, within 10 days, set a date for election of officials of the new municipality. The election date shall be not less than 60 or more than 90 days after the election order and it is the effective date for the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 18 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.150.
Succession to rights and liabilities.

When two or more municipalities merge, one succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the others.

When two or more municipalities consolidate, the newly incorporated municipality succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the consolidated municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since general grant land entitlements are considered vested property rights, the practical effect of this section is that merger or consolidation does not create the right to an additional entitlement. The merger or consolidation itself does not create any additional entitlement or trigger AS

29.65.030(a)

. September 16, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.06.160.
Transition.

After merger or consolidation, the ordinances, resolutions, regulations, procedures, and orders of the former municipalities remain in force in their respective territories until superseded by the action of the new municipality.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where a borough voted on an ordinance to create a service area after a petition for consolidation with a city had been filed, the new home rule municipality formed through consolidation would represent the citizens of the two municipalities and be specifically authorized to supercede the “ordinances, resolutions, regulations, procedures, and orders of the former municipalities” in order to provide for new ordinances, etc., as the representative government.
Thus, the prohibition in AS

29.26.190(a)

against modifying or negating ordinances within two years of the effective date of adoption would not apply. March 8, 2002 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.06.170.
Application.

AS

29.06.090

—

29.06.170

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)